California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) That amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is not allocated to an enterprise special district as a result of subdivision (a) shall instead be deposited in the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund and shall be allocated as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 97.3.

(c) For purposes of this section, all of the
 following apply:

(1) “Enterprise special district” means a special district that performs, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report, an enterprise function. “Enterprise special district” does not include a fire protection district that was formed under the Shade Tree Law of 1909 set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25620) of Chapter 7 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code, a local health care district as described in Division 23 (commencing with Section 32000) of the Health and Safety Code, or a qualified special district as defined in Section 97.34.

(2) With respect to an enterprise special district that also performs, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report, a police protection nonenterprise function with certified peace officers, as described in Chapter
 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or a fire protection nonenterprise function, “the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue of the district for the 2001–02 fiscal year” does not include ad valorem property tax revenue of that district for fire protection or police protection nonenterprise functions, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report.

(3) For purposes of this section, “revenues that are pledged to debt service” includes only those amounts required as the sole source of repayment to pay debt service costs in the 2002–03 fiscal year on debt instruments issued by an enterprise special district for the acquisition of fixed assets. For purposes of this paragraph, “fixed assets” means land, buildings, equipment, and improvements, including improvements to buildings.

(d) For the purposes
 of this section, if a special district’s financial transactions do not appear in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report, the Controller shall use the most recent data available for that district.

(e) For the 2005–06 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amounts determined under subdivision (a) of Section 96.1, or any successor to that provision, shall not reflect, for a preceding fiscal year, any portion of any allocation required by this section.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 211) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 610, Sec. 8.   Effective September 20, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

97.73.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for each of the 2004-05 and 2005-06 fiscal years, all of the following apply:

(a) (1) (A) The total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue, other than those revenues that are pledged to debt service, otherwise allocated for each of those fiscal years to each nonenterprise special district shall be reduced by 10 percent of the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue of the district for the 2001-02 fiscal year,
 as reported in the 2001-02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for the Laguna Niguel Community Service District in the County of Orange, the reduction described in subparagraph (A) shall be 4 percent rather than 10 percent.

(ii) If the district described in clause (i) is not dissolved before July 1, 2006, for each of the 2006-07 and 2007-08 fiscal years, the auditor shall reduce the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue, other than those revenues that are pledged to debt service, otherwise allocated to that district for each of those fiscal years by 6 percent of the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue of the district for the 2001-02 fiscal year, as reported in the 2001-02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report.

(C) If a nonenterprise special district is located in more than one county, the auditor of each county in which that nonenterprise special district is located shall implement that portion of the total reduction, required by subparagraph (A) with respect to that district, determined by the ratio of the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to that district from the county to the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to that district from all counties.

(2) The Controller shall determine the amount of the ad valorem property tax revenue reduction required by paragraph (1) for each nonenterprise special district in each county and notify the Director of Finance of these amounts on or before October 25, 2004.

(b) That amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is not allocated to a
 nonenterprise special district as a result of subdivision (a) shall instead be deposited in the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund and shall be allocated as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 97.3.

(c) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) (A) “Nonenterprise special district” means a special district that engages solely, as reported in the 2001-02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report, in nonenterprise functions, and a qualified special district as defined in Section 97.34.

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, “nonenterprise special district” does not include any of the following:

(i) A fire protection district that was formed under the Shade Tree Law of
 1909 set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25620) of Chapter 7 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(ii) A police protection district formed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 14 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) A fire protection district formed under the Fire Protection District Law of 1987 (Part 2.7 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code) or a fire protection district formed under the Fire Protection District Law of 1961, or any of its statutory predecessors, and that existed on January 1, 1988.

(iv) Any library special district, including, but not limited to, the following:

(I) A county free library system established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with
 Section 19100) of Chapter 6 of Part 11 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(II) A unified school district and union school district public library district established pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18300) of Part 11 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(III) A library district established pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 19400) of Part 11 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(IV) A library district in unincorporated towns and villages established pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 19600) of Part 11 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(v) A memorial district formed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1170) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the
 Military and Veterans Code.

(vi) A mosquito abatement district or a vector control district formed pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 3 of the Health and Safety Code, or any predecessor to that law.

(vii) The Glenn County Pest Abatement District and the East Side Mosquito Abatement District formed pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(viii) (I) For the 2005-06 fiscal year, a local health care district as described in Division 23 (commencing with Section 32000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(II) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in making the determinations required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 97.72, the
 Controller shall ensure that the operation of this clause does not result in a net increase in the total amount of the reduction for any special district required by this section or Section 97.72 for the 2005-06 fiscal year from the total amount of the reduction determined under those provisions for that special district for the 2004-05 fiscal year.

(2) With respect to a nonenterprise special district that performs, as reported in the 2001-02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report, nonenterprise functions and police protection services with certified peace officers, as described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or nonenterprise functions and fire protection services, “the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue of the district for the 2001-02 fiscal year” does not include ad valorem property tax revenue of that district for fire protection or police protection
 nonenterprise functions, as reported in the 2001-02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report.

(3) With respect to a nonenterprise special district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3 of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code that performs, as reported in the 2001-02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report, nonenterprise functions and police protection services with certified peace officers, as described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or nonenterprise functions and fire protection services, “the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue of the district for the 2001-02 fiscal year” does not include total expenditures net of total revenues by that district for fire protection or police protection nonenterprise functions, as reported in the 2001-02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual
 Report.

(4) For purposes of this section, “revenues that are pledged to debt service” includes only those amounts required as the sole source of repayment to pay debt service costs in the 2002-03 fiscal year on debt instruments issued by a nonenterprise special district for the acquisition of fixed assets. For purposes of this paragraph, “fixed assets” means land, buildings, equipment, and improvements, including improvements to buildings.

(d) For the purposes of this section, if a special district’s financial transactions do not appear in the 2001-02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report, the Controller shall use the most recent data available for that district.

(e) For the 2005-06 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amounts determined under subdivision (a) of Section 96.1,
 or any successor to that provision, shall not reflect, for a preceding fiscal year, any portion of any allocation required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 602, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

97.75.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2004–05 and 2005–06 fiscal years, a county shall not impose a fee, charge, or other levy on a city, nor reduce a city’s allocation of ad valorem property tax revenue, in reimbursement for the services performed by the county under Sections 97.68 and 97.70. For the 2006–07 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, a county may impose a fee, charge, or other levy on a city for these services, but the fee, charge, or other levy shall not exceed the actual cost of providing these
 services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 211, Sec. 26.   Effective August 5, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

97.76.

(a) On or before September 1, 2004, the Controller shall determine the countywide vehicle license fee adjustment amount, as defined in Section 97.70, for the 2004–05 fiscal year and the vehicle license fee adjustment amount, as defined in Section 97.70, for each city, county, and city and county for the 2004–05 fiscal year, and notify the county auditor of these amounts.

(b) On or before October 15, 2005, in consultation with the Bureau of State Audits, the
 Controller shall determine the amount specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 97.70 for each city, county, and city and county and notify the county auditor of these amounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 67.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

97.77.

An enterprise special district and a nonenterprise special district shall not pledge, on or after July 1, 2004, and before June 30, 2006, through a bond covenant to pay debt service costs on debt instruments issued by the district, any ad valorem property tax revenue that would otherwise be dedicated to the reduction required by Sections 97.72 and 97.73.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 211, Sec. 28.   Effective August 5, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

97.78.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2007–08 fiscal year, the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue deemed allocated by the Fresno County Auditor to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for the Fresno Metropolitan Flood Control District shall be decreased, for the prior fiscal year, by six hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($633,000).

(2) Any reduction in the amount of ad valorem property tax revenues deposited in the county’s
 Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund resulting from the implementation of paragraph (1) shall be applied exclusively to reduce the amounts that are allocated from that fund to school districts and county offices of education, and shall not be applied to reduce the amounts of ad valorem property tax revenues that are allocated from that fund to community college districts.

(b) For the 2008–09 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amounts determined under subdivision (a) of Section 96.1, or any successor to that provision, shall reflect, for a preceding fiscal year, the allocation adjustments required by this section.

(c) In making the determinations required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 97.2 for the 2007–08 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Director of Finance shall ensure that the operation of this section does
 not result in a net increase in the total amount of the reduction required by Section 97.2 for any special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 490, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

97.81.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2011–12 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the auditor of a qualified county shall do both of the following:

(1) Increase the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to that county by the county equity amount.

(2) (A) Decrease the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund by the county equity amount.

(B) If, for any fiscal year, there is not enough ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to a county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for the auditor to complete the allocation reduction required by subparagraph (A), the auditor shall additionally reduce the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to all school districts in the county for that fiscal year by an amount equal to the difference between the county equity amount and the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for that fiscal year. This reduction for each school district in the county shall be the
 percentage share of the total reduction that is equal to the proportion that the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to the school district bears to the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to all school districts in a county. For purposes of this subparagraph, “school districts” do not include any districts that are excess tax school entities, as defined in Section 95.

(C) Any reduction in the amount of ad valorem property tax revenues deposited in the county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund as a result of subparagraph (A) shall be applied exclusively to reduce the amounts that are allocated from that fund to school districts and county offices of education, and shall not be applied to reduce the amounts of ad valorem property tax revenues that are otherwise required to be allocated from that fund to community college
 districts.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified county” means the county that, of all the counties in the state, was allocated the second lowest percentage of the sum of both of the following for the 2006–07 fiscal year:

(A) The countywide ad valorem property tax revenue.

(B) The less than countywide ad valorem property tax revenue.

(2) “County equity amount” means one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in the 2012–13 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(c) For the 2011–12 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, ad valorem
 property tax revenue allocations made pursuant to Sections 96.1 and 96.5 shall not incorporate the allocation adjustments made by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   (SB 85)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Tax Equity Allocations for Certain Cities [98. - 98.2.]

98.

(a) In each county, other than the County of Ventura, having within its boundaries a qualifying city, the computations made pursuant to Section 96.1 or its predecessor section, for the 1989–90 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be modified as follows:

With respect to tax rate areas within the boundaries of a qualifying city, there shall be excluded from the aggregate amount of “property tax revenue allocated pursuant to this chapter to local agencies, other than for a qualifying city, in the prior fiscal year,” an amount equal to the sum of the amounts calculated pursuant to the TEA formula.

(b) (1) Except
 as otherwise provided in this section, each qualifying city shall, for the 1989–90 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, be allocated by the auditor an amount determined pursuant to the TEA formula.

(2) For each qualifying city, the auditor shall, for the 1989–90 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, allocate the amount determined pursuant to the TEA formula to all tax rate areas within that city in proportion to each tax rate area’s share of the total assessed value in the city for the applicable fiscal year, and the amount so determined shall be subtracted from the county’s proportionate share of property tax revenue for that fiscal year within those tax rate areas.

(3) After making the allocations pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), but before making the calculations pursuant to Section 96.5 or its predecessor section, the auditor shall, for all tax rate areas in
 the qualifying city, calculate the proportionate share of property tax revenue allocated pursuant to this section and Section 96.1, or their predecessor sections, in the 1989–90 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter to each jurisdiction in the tax rate area.

(4) In lieu of making the allocations of annual tax increment pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 96.5 or its predecessor section, the auditor shall, for the 1989–90 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, allocate the amount of property tax revenue determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 96.5 or its predecessor section to jurisdictions in the tax rate area using the proportionate shares derived pursuant to paragraph (3).

(5) For purposes of the calculations made pursuant to Section 96.1 or its predecessor section, in the 1990–91 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amounts that would have
 been allocated to qualifying cities pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be the “amount of property tax revenue allocated in the prior fiscal year.”

(c) “TEA formula” means the Tax Equity Allocation formula, and shall be calculated by the auditor for each qualifying city as follows:

(1) For the 1988–89 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the auditor shall determine the total amount of property tax revenue to be allocated to all jurisdictions in all tax rate areas within the qualifying city, before the allocation and payment of funds in that fiscal year to a community redevelopment agency within the qualifying city, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The auditor shall determine the total amount of funds allocated in each fiscal year to a community
 redevelopment agency in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The auditor shall determine the total amount of funds paid in each fiscal year by a community redevelopment agency within the city to jurisdictions other than the city pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 33401 and Section 33676 of the Health and Safety Code, and the cost to the redevelopment agency of any land or facilities transferred and any amounts paid to jurisdictions other than the city to assist in the construction or reconstruction of facilities pursuant to an agreement entered into under Section 33401 or 33445.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) The auditor shall subtract the amount determined in paragraph (3) from the amount determined in paragraph (2).

(5) The auditor shall subtract the amount
 determined in paragraph (4) from the amount determined in paragraph (1).

(6) The amount computed in paragraph (5) shall be multiplied by the following percentages in order to determine the TEA formula amount to be distributed to the qualifying city in each fiscal year:

(A) For the first fiscal year in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 1 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(B) For the second fiscal year in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 2 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(C) For the third fiscal year in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 3 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(D) For the fourth fiscal year in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 4 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(E) For the fifth fiscal year in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 5 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(F) For the sixth fiscal year in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 6 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(G) For the seventh fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter in which the city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 7 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(d) “Qualifying city” means
 any city, except a qualifying city as defined in Section 98.1, that incorporated prior to June 5, 1987, and had an amount of property tax revenue allocated to it pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 96.1 or its predecessor section in the 1988–89 fiscal year that is less than 7 percent of the amount of property tax revenue computed as follows:

(1) The auditor shall determine the total amount of property tax revenue allocated to the city in the 1988–89 fiscal year.

(2) The auditor shall subtract the amount in the 1988–89 fiscal year determined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) from the amount determined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(3) The auditor shall subtract the amount determined in paragraph (2) from the amount of property tax revenue determined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(4) The auditor shall divide the amount of property tax revenue determined in paragraph (1) of this subdivision by the amount of property tax revenue determined in paragraph (3) of this subdivision.

(5) If the quotient determined in paragraph (4) of this subdivision is less than 0.07, the city is a qualifying city. If the quotient determined in that paragraph is equal to or greater than 0.07, the city is not a qualifying city.

(e) The auditor may assess each qualifying city its proportional share of the actual costs of making the calculations required by this section, and may deduct that assessment from the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (b). For purposes of this subdivision, a qualifying city’s proportional share of the auditor’s actual costs shall not exceed the proportion it receives of the total amounts
 excluded in the county pursuant to subdivision (a).

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), in any fiscal year in which a qualifying city is to receive a distribution pursuant to this section, the auditor shall reduce the actual amount distributed to the qualifying city by the sum of the following:

(1) The amount of property tax revenue that was exchanged between the county and the qualifying city as a result of negotiation pursuant to Section 99.03.

(2) (A) The amount of revenue not collected by the qualifying city in the first fiscal year following the city’s reduction after January 1, 1988, of the tax rate or tax base of any locally imposed tax, except any tax that was imposed after January 1, 1988. In the case of a tax that existed before January 1, 1988, this clause shall apply only with
 respect to an amount attributable to a reduction of the rate or base to a level lower than the rate or base applicable on January 1, 1988. The amount so computed by the auditor shall constitute a reduction in the amount of property tax revenue distributed to the qualifying city pursuant to this section in each succeeding fiscal year. That amount shall be aggregated with any additional amount computed pursuant to this clause as the result of the city’s reduction in any subsequent year of the tax rate or tax base of the same or any other locally imposed general or special tax.

(B) No reduction may be made pursuant to subparagraph (A) in the case in which a local tax is reduced or eliminated as a result of either a court decision or the approval or rejection of a ballot measure by the voters.

(3) The amount of property tax revenue received pursuant to this chapter in excess of the
 amount allocated for the 1986–87 fiscal year by all special districts that are governed by the city council of the qualifying city or whose governing body is the same as the city council of the qualifying city with respect to all tax rate areas within the boundaries of the qualifying city.

Notwithstanding this paragraph:

(A) Commencing with the 1994–95 fiscal year, the auditor shall not reduce the amount distributed to a qualifying city under this section by reason of that city becoming the successor agency to a special district, that is dissolved, merged with that city, or becomes a subsidiary district of that city, on or after July 1, 1994.

(B) Commencing with the 1997–98 fiscal year, the auditor shall not reduce the amount distributed to a qualifying city under this section by reason of that city withdrawing from a county free library
 system pursuant to Section 19116 of the Education Code.

(4) Any amount of property tax revenues that has been exchanged pursuant to Section 56842 of the Government Code, as that section read on January 1, 1998, between the City of Rancho Mirage and a community services district, the formation of which was initiated on or after March 6, 1997, pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 56800) of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, in no event may the auditor reduce the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise allocated to a qualifying city pursuant to this section on the basis of any additional ad valorem property tax revenues received by that city pursuant to a services for revenue agreement. For purposes of this subdivision, a “services for revenue agreement” means any agreement between a
 qualifying city and the county in which it is located, entered into by joint resolution of that city and that county, under which additional service responsibilities are exchanged in consideration for additional property tax revenues.

(h) In any fiscal year in which a qualifying city is to receive a distribution pursuant to this section, the auditor shall increase the actual amount distributed to the qualifying city by the amount of property tax revenue allocated to the qualifying city pursuant to Section 19116 of the Education Code.

(i) If the auditor determines that the amount to be distributed to a qualifying city pursuant to subdivision (b), as modified by subdivisions (e), (f), and (g) would result in a qualifying city having proceeds of taxes in excess of its appropriation limit, the auditor shall reduce the amount, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, by the amount that exceeds
 the city’s appropriations limit.

(j) The amount not distributed to the tax rate areas of a qualifying city as a result of this section shall be distributed by the auditor to the county.

(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no qualifying city shall be distributed an amount pursuant to this section that is less than the amount the city would have been allocated without the application of the TEA formula.

(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the auditor shall not distribute any amount determined pursuant to this section to any qualifying city that has in the prior fiscal year used any revenues or issued bonds for the construction, acquisition, or development, of any facility which is defined in Section 103(b)(4), 103(b)(5), or 103(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954
 prior to the enactment of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-514) and is no longer eligible for tax-exempt financing.

(m) (1) The amendments made to this section, and the repeal of Section 98.04, by the act that added this subdivision shall apply for the 2006–07 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(2) For the 2006–07 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, all of the following apply:

(A) The auditor of the County of Santa Clara shall do both of the following:

(i) Reduce the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise required to be allocated to qualifying cities in that county by the ERAF reimbursement amount. This reduction for each qualifying city in the county for each fiscal year shall be
 the percentage share, of the total reduction required by this clause for all qualifying cities in the county for the 2006–07 fiscal year, that is equal to the proportion that the total amount of additional ad valorem property tax revenue that is required to be allocated to the qualifying city as a result of the act that added this subdivision bears to the total amount of additional ad valorem property tax revenue that is required to be allocated to all qualifying cities in the county as a result of the act that added this subdivision.

(ii) Increase the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise required to be allocated to the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund by the ERAF reimbursement amount.

(B) For purposes of this subdivision, “ERAF reimbursement amount” means an amount equal to the difference between the following two amounts:

(i) The portion of the annual tax increment that would have been allocated from the county to the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for the applicable fiscal year if the act that added this subdivision had not been enacted.

(ii) The portion of the annual tax increment that is allocated from the county to the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for the applicable fiscal year.

(n) Notwithstanding subdivision (m) and except as provided in paragraph (2), for the 2015–16 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The auditor of the County of Santa Clara shall do both of the following:

(A) (i) Reduce the total
 amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise required to be allocated to qualifying cities in that county by the percentage specified in clause (ii) of the ERAF reimbursement amount. This reduction for each qualifying city in the county for each fiscal year shall be the percentage share, of the total reduction required by this clause for all qualifying cities in the county for the 2015–16 fiscal year, that is equal to the proportion that the total amount of additional ad valorem property tax revenue that is required to be allocated to the qualifying city as a result of the act that added this subdivision bears to the total amount of additional ad valorem property tax revenue that is required to be allocated to all qualifying cities in the county as a result of the act that added this subdivision.

(ii) (I) For the first fiscal year in which qualifying cities receive an allocation pursuant to this subdivision, 80
 percent.

(II) For the second fiscal year in which qualifying cities receive an allocation pursuant to this subdivision, 60 percent.

(III) For the third fiscal year in which qualifying cities receive an allocation pursuant to this subdivision, 40 percent.

(IV) For the fourth fiscal year in which qualifying cities receive an allocation pursuant to this subdivision, 20 percent.

(V) For the fifth fiscal year in which qualifying cities receive an allocation pursuant to this subdivision, and for each fiscal year thereafter in which a qualifying city receives an allocation pursuant to this subdivision, zero percent.

(B) Increase the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise
 required to be allocated to the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund by the percentage specified in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of the ERAF reimbursement amount.

(2) The auditor of the County of Santa Clara shall not adjust the ERAF reimbursement amount by the percentages specified in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) in any fiscal year in which the amount of moneys required to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts is determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “ERAF reimbursement amount” has the same meaning as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (m).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 325, Sec. 26.   (SB 107)   Effective September 22, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

98.01.

(a) An independent qualifying city shall receive a distribution of the following percentages of the TEA formula, as computed in subdivision (c) of Section 98, if the amount of that distribution, less the applicable reductions provided for in subdivisions (e), (f), and (g) of Section 98, would be greater than the amount the city would have been allocated without the application of the TEA formula:

(1) Thirty-three and one-third percent of the amount determined in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 98, less any applicable reductions provided for in subdivisions (e), (f), and (g) of Section 98, for the first fiscal year in which the independent qualifying city receives an allocation pursuant to this section.

(2) Sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the amount determined in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 98, less any applicable reductions provided for in subdivisions (e), (f), and (g) of Section 98, for the second fiscal year in which the independent qualifying city receives an allocation pursuant to this section.

(3) One hundred percent of the amount determined in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 98, less any applicable reductions provided for in subdivisions (e), (f), and (g) of Section 98, for the third fiscal year in which the independent qualifying city receives an allocation pursuant to this section.

The amount not distributed as a result of this subdivision to the tax rate areas in each independent qualifying city, shall be allocated by the auditor to the county. The auditor may assess each independent qualifying city its proportional share of the actual costs of making the calculations required by this subdivision, and may deduct that assessment from the amount allocated pursuant to this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, an independent qualifying city’s proportional share of the auditor’s actual costs shall not exceed the proportion it receives of the total amounts excluded in the county pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 98.

(b) “Independent qualifying city” means a qualifying city, as defined in Section 98, in the County of Los Angeles which met the following criteria on January 1, 1988:

(1) Was not served by a special district which received a portion of the 1 percent property tax revenue, and provided any of the following services to the qualified city:

(A) Emergency medical services.

(B) Fire prevention services.

(C) Fire suppression.

(D) Libraries.

(E) Parks.

(F) Recreation services.

(G) Street lighting.

(2) Did not have redevelopment project areas which receive property tax revenues.

(3) The county general fund received greater than 65 percent of the 1 percent property tax revenues collected from tax rate areas within the qualifying city’s boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

98.02.

(a) In the County of Ventura, the computations made pursuant to Section 96.1 or its predecessor section, for the 1989–90 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be modified as follows:

With respect to tax rate areas, except excluded tax rate areas, within the boundaries of a qualifying city, there shall be excluded from the aggregate amount of “property tax revenue allocated pursuant to this chapter to local agencies, other than for a qualifying city, in the prior fiscal year,” an amount equal to the sum of the amounts calculated pursuant to the TEA formula.

(b) (1) Each qualifying city shall, for the 1989–90
 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, be allocated by the auditor an amount determined pursuant to the TEA formula.

(2) For each qualifying city, the auditor shall, for the 1989–90 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, distribute the amount determined pursuant to the TEA formula to all tax rate areas, except excluded tax rate areas, within that city in proportion to each tax rate area’s share of the total assessed value in the city for the applicable fiscal year, and the amount so determined shall be subtracted from the county’s proportionate share of the property tax revenue for that fiscal year within those tax rate areas.

(3) After making the allocations pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), but before making the calculations pursuant to Section 96.5 or its predecessor section, the auditor shall, for all tax rate areas, except excluded tax rate areas, in the
 qualifying city, calculate the proportionate share of property tax revenue allocated pursuant to this section and Section 96.1, or their predecessor sections, in the 1989–90 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter to each jurisdiction in the tax rate area.
